District of Columbia statutes.
8-109.04

Adverse impact findings.

If the EIS identifies an adverse effect from a proposed major action and contains a finding that the public health, safety, or welfare is imminently and substantially endangered by the action, the Mayor, board, commission, or authority of the District government shall disapprove the action, unless the applicant proposes mitigating measures or substitutes a reasonable alternative to avoid the danger.

Oct. 18, 1989, D.C. Law 8-36, § 5, 36 DCR 5741
1981 Ed., § 6-984.